Maine, session 132, LD1061.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Provides funding to the Office of Child and Family Services to strengthen the
capacity of the Maine Child Abuse Prevention Councils to provide universal community
support for families and essential child abuse prevention services statewide.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,563,470 $1,563,470
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,563,470 $1,563,470
2240 Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
2251 takes effect when approved.